Florida, session 2026, HB5207.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:
90
91 Section 1. Subsection (9) of section 110.12315, Florida
92 Statutes, is amended to read:
93 110.12315 Prescription drug program.—The state employees'
94 prescription drug program is established. This program shall be
95 administered by the Department of Management Services, according
96 to the terms and conditions of the plan as established by the
97 relevant provisions of the annual General Appropriations Act and
98 implementing legislation, subject to the following conditions:
99 (9)(a) Beginning with the 2027 2020 plan year, the
100 department must implement formulary management for prescription
Page 4 of 54
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5207-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5207 2026
101 drugs and supplies. Such management practices must require
102 prescription drugs to be subject to formulary inclusion or
103 exclusion but may not restrict access to the most clinically
104 appropriate, clinically effective, and lowest net-cost
105 prescription drugs and supplies. Drugs excluded from the
106 formulary must be available for inclusion if a physician,
107 advanced practice registered nurse, or physician assistant
108 prescribing a pharmaceutical clearly states on the prescription
109 that the excluded drug is medically necessary. Prescription
110 drugs and supplies first made available in the marketplace after
111 January 1, 2027 2020, may not be covered by the prescription
112 drug program until specifically included in the list of covered
113 prescription drugs and supplies.
114 (b) No later than October 1, 2026 2019, and by each
115 October 1 thereafter, the department must submit to the
116 Governor, the President of the Senate, and the Speaker of the
117 House of Representatives the list of prescription drugs and
118 supplies that will be excluded from program coverage for the
119 next plan year. If the department proposes to exclude
120 prescription drugs and supplies after the plan year has
121 commenced, the department must provide notice to the Governor,
122 the President of the Senate, and the Speaker of the House of
123 Representatives of such exclusions at least 60 days before
124 implementation of such exclusions.
125 Section 2. Section 110.12316, Florida Statutes, is created
Page 5 of 54
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5207-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5207 2026
126 to read:
127 110.12316 Administrative health insurance assessments
128 against state agencies for vacant positions.—
129 (1) As used in this section, the term "state agency" means
130 an agency within the State Personnel System, the Department of
131 the Lottery, the Justice Administrative Commission and all
132 entities administratively housed in the Justice Administrative
133 Commission, and the state courts system.
134 (2) Beginning July 1, 2026, and on the first day of each
135 month thereafter, the Department of Management Services shall
136 make an administrative health insurance assessment against each
137 state agency equal to the employer's cost of individual employee
138 health care coverage for each vacant position within the state
139 agency eligible for coverage through the Division of State Group
140 Insurance.
141 (3) Within 30 days after receipt of the administrative
142 health insurance assessment under subsection (2) from the
143 department, each state agency shall remit to the State Employees
144 Health Insurance Trust Fund the assessment for the state group
145 insurance program, as provided in ss. 110.123 and 110.1239, from
146 currently allocated moneys for salaries and benefits. If a state
147 agency becomes more than 60 days delinquent in payment of the
148 assessment, the department shall certify to the Chief Financial
149 Officer the amount due and the Chief Financial Officer shall
150 transfer to the department the amount due.
Page 6 of 54
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5207-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5207 2026
151 (4) The administrative health insurance assessment must
152 apply to all vacant positions funded with state funds, whether
153 fully or partially funded with state funds. Vacant positions
154 partially funded with state funds must pay a percentage of the
155 assessment imposed in subsection (2) equal to the percentage
156 share of state funds provided for the vacant positions. The
157 assessment does not apply to vacant positions that are fully
158 funded with federal funds. By July 31, 2026, each state agency
159 shall provide the department with a complete list of all
160 positions by position number which are fully or partially funded
161 with federal funds and shall include the percentage of federal
162 funding for each position. Thereafter, each state agency shall
163 update the list on the last day of each month. For vacant
164 positions that are fully or partially funded with federal funds,
165 each state agency shall immediately take steps to include the
166 administrative health insurance assessment in its indirect cost
167 plan for the 2026-2027 fiscal year and each fiscal year
168 thereafter. A state agency shall notify the department, the
169 Executive Office of the Governor, and the chair and vice chair
170 of the Legislative Budget Commission of the updated indirect
171 cost plan, upon approval from the federal awarding agency. If
172 the state agency cannot obtain approval from its federal
173 awarding agency, the state agency shall notify the department,
174 the Executive Office of the Governor, and the chair and vice
175 chair of the Legislative Budget Commission no later than January
Page 7 of 54
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5207-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5207 2026
176 15 of each calendar year.
177 (5) Pursuant to the notice, review, and objection
178 procedures of s. 216.177, the Executive Office of the Governor
179 may transfer budget authority appropriated in the Salaries and
180 Benefits appropriation category between state agencies in order
181 to align the appropriations granted with the assessment that
182 must be paid by each state agency to the department for the
183 administrative health insurance assessment.
184 Section 3. Paragraph (d) of subsection (1) of section
185 110.605, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
186 110.605 Powers and duties; personnel rules, records,
187 reports, and performance appraisal.—
188 (1) The department shall adopt and administer uniform
189 personnel rules, records, and reports relating to employees and
190 positions in the Selected Exempt Service, as well as any other
191 rules and procedures relating to personnel administration which
192 are necessary to carry out the purposes of this part.
193 (d) The department shall develop a program of affirmative
194 and positive actions that will ensure full utilization of women
195 and minorities in Selected Exempt Service positions.
196 Section 4. Section 272.04, Florida Statutes, is amended to
197 read:
198 272.04 Department to allocate space.—
199 (1) The Department of Management Services shall have
200 authority to allocate space to house the various departments,
Page 8 of 54
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5207-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5207 2026
201 agencies, boards, and commissions in said buildings, excepting,
202 however, the new Supreme Court Building, for which authority
203 shall be vested in the justices of the Supreme Court.
204 (2) Notwithstanding any other law, the Governor, the
205 Cabinet officers, and the Legislature are permanent tenants of
206 the Capitol Complex. The interior space allocated to each tenant
207 on or after January 1, 2026, may not be reduced or moved without
208 express consent of the tenant. If additional interior space
209 becomes vacant, the Legislature has the first right of refusal
210 for use of the space.
211 Section 5. Subsection (4) of section 272.09, Florida
212 Statutes, is renumbered as subsection (5), subsections (1) and
213 (2) of that section are amended, and a new subsection (4) is
214 added to that section, to read:
215 272.09 Management, maintenance, and upkeep of Capitol
216 Center.—
217 (1) For purposes of this section, the term "Capitol
218 Complex" means the portion of the Capitol Center commonly
219 referred to as the Capitol, the Historic Capitol, the Senate
220 Office Building, the House Office Building, the Knott Building,
221 the Pepper Building, the Holland Building, the former Elliot
222 Building property, the R.A. Gray Building, the Mayo Building,
223 and the associated parking garages and curtilage of each,
224 including the state-owned lands and public streets adjacent
225 thereto within an area bounded by and including Calhoun Street,
Page 9 of 54
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5207-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5207 2026
226 Meridian Street, East Pensacola Street, Monroe Street, Jefferson
227 Street, West Pensacola Street, Martin Luther King Jr. Boulevard,
228 and Gaines Street. The term does not include the Supreme Court
229 Building or the public streets adjacent thereto. The Mayo
230 Building, its associated parking garage, and the portion of the
231 Capitol Complex existing between and including the former Elliot
232 Building property and the Holland Building within an area
233 bounded by and including Monroe Street, Gaines Street, Calhoun
234 Street, and East Pensacola Street shall be known as "Memorial
235 Park."
236 (2) The management, maintenance, and upkeep of the Capitol
237 Center as described in s. 272.03 are hereby vested in and made
238 the direct obligation of the Department of Management Services,
239 which shall have authority to do all things necessary to
240 satisfactorily accomplish these functions, including the
241 employment of a superintendent of grounds and buildings and
242 other employees; the establishment of central repair and
243 maintenance shops; and the designation or appointment of
244 nonsalaried advisory committees to advise with them. The
245 department shall begin management, maintenance, and upkeep of
246 the Mayo Building after the Department of Agriculture and
247 Consumer Services vacates the building.
248 (4)(a) Before the Department of Management Services may
249 plan for or schedule any project that impacts space occupied by
250 a permanent tenant of the Capitol Center other than the
Page 10 of 54
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5207-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5207 2026
251 Governor, the department must consult with the tenant and
252 receive the tenant's approval on the scope, design, and timeline
253 of the project. For purposes of space in which the Legislature
254 is the tenant, the Department of Management Services must
255 coordinate with and receive approval from the President of the
256 Senate or the Speaker of the House of Representatives, or both,
257 as appropriate. For any project that impacts space in which the
258 Legislature is the tenant, the Department of Management Services
259 must consider the schedule, time constraints, and needs of the
260 Legislature.
261 (b) The President of the Senate and the Speaker of the
262 House of Representatives may design, redesign, renovate, or
263 upgrade any space allocated to his or her chamber in which the
264 Senate or the House of Representatives is the tenant without
265 approval by the Department of Management Services.
266 (c) The Department of Management Services must consult
267 with and receive approval from the President of the Senate or
268 the Speaker of the House of Representatives, or both, as
269 appropriate, before including in the report required under
270 subsection (3) any project that impacts any space in the Capitol
271 Complex in which the Legislature is the tenant.
272 Section 6. Subsection (3) of section 272.121, Florida
273 Statutes, is amended to read:
274 272.121 Capitol Center long-range planning.—
275 (3) In carrying out the provisions of the foregoing, the
Page 11 of 54
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5207-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5207 2026
276 department shall request the cooperation of those state and
277 private architects, engineers, and interior designers determined
278 by the department to possess expertise or information helpful to
279 the development of a Capitol Plan and solicit and accept
280 information, suggestions, and recommendations from all
281 interested parties. The department must solicit feedback from
282 all permanent tenants of the Capitol Center, including the
283 Governor, the Chief Financial Officer, the Attorney General, the
284 Commissioner of Agriculture, the President of the Senate, and
285 the Speaker of the House of Representatives.
286 Section 7. Subsection (2) of section 272.16, Florida
287 Statutes, is amended to read:
288 272.16 Parking areas within Capitol Center area.—
289 (2)(a) The presiding officer of each house of the
290 Legislature shall be responsible for the assignment of parking
291 spaces in its respective office building.
292 (b) The parking spaces allocated to the Legislature on or
293 after January 1, 2026, may not be reduced or reassigned without
294 the express consent of the Legislature. If additional parking
295 spaces become available for assignment, the Legislature has the
296 first right of refusal for the use of the parking spaces.
297 Section 8. Subsections (19) through (29) of section
298 287.012, Florida Statutes, are renumbered as subsections (18)
299 through (28), respectively, and present subsections (18) and
300 (19) of that section are amended to read:
Page 12 of 54
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5207-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5207 2026
301 287.012 Definitions.—As used in this part, the term:
302 (18) "Minority business enterprise" has the same meaning
303 as provided in s. 288.703.
304 (18)(19) "Office" means the Office of Supplier Development
305 Diversity of the Department of Management Services.
306 Section 9. Paragraphs (a) and (c) of subsection (2) and
307 paragraphs (b) and (c) of subsection (3) of section 287.042,
308 Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
309 287.042 Powers, duties, and functions.—The department
310 shall have the following powers, duties, and functions:
311 (2)(a) To establish purchasing agreements and procure
312 state term contracts for commodities and contractual services,
313 pursuant to s. 287.057, under which state agencies shall, and
314 eligible users may, make purchases pursuant to s. 287.056. The
315 department may restrict purchases from some term contracts to
316 state agencies only for those term contracts where the inclusion
317 of other governmental entities will have an adverse effect on
318 competition or to those federal facilities located in this
319 state. In such planning or purchasing the Office of Supplier
320 Diversity may monitor to ensure that opportunities are afforded
321 for contracting with minority business enterprises. The
322 department, for state term contracts, and all agencies, for
323 multiyear contractual services or term contracts, shall explore
324 reasonable and economical means to utilize certified minority
325 business enterprises. Purchases by any county, municipality,
Page 13 of 54
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5207-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5207 2026
326 private nonprofit community transportation coordinator
327 designated pursuant to chapter 427, while conducting business
328 related solely to the Commission for the Transportation
329 Disadvantaged, or other local public agency under the provisions
330 in the state purchasing contracts, and purchases, from the
331 corporation operating the correctional work programs, of
332 products or services that are subject to paragraph (1)(f), are
333 exempt from the competitive solicitation requirements otherwise
334 applying to their purchases.
335 (c) Any person who files an action protesting a decision
336 or intended decision pertaining to contracts administered by the
337 department, a water management district, or an agency pursuant
338 to s. 120.57(3)(b) shall post with the department, the water
339 management district, or the agency at the time of filing the
340 formal written protest a bond payable to the department, the
341 water management district, or agency in an amount equal to 1
342 percent of the estimated contract amount. For protests of
343 decisions or intended decisions pertaining to exceptional
344 purchases, the bond shall be in an amount equal to 1 percent of
345 the estimated contract amount for the exceptional purchase. The
346 estimated contract amount shall be based upon the contract price
347 submitted by the protestor or, if no contract price was
348 submitted, the department, water management district, or agency
349 shall estimate the contract amount based on factors including,
350 but not limited to, the price of previous or existing contracts
Page 14 of 54
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5207-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5207 2026
351 for similar commodities or contractual services, the amount
352 appropriated by the Legislature for the contract, or the fair
353 market value of similar commodities or contractual services. The
354 agency shall provide the estimated contract amount to the vendor
355 within 72 hours, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and state
356 holidays, after the filing of the notice of protest by the
357 vendor. The estimated contract amount is not subject to protest
358 pursuant to s. 120.57(3). The bond shall be conditioned upon the
359 payment of all costs and charges that are adjudged against the
360 protestor in the administrative hearing in which the action is
361 brought and in any subsequent appellate court proceeding. In
362 lieu of a bond, the department, the water management district,
363 or agency may, in either case, accept a cashier's check,
364 official bank check, or money order in the amount of the bond.
365 If, after completion of the administrative hearing process and
366 any appellate court proceedings, the department, water
367 management district, or agency prevails, it shall recover all
368 costs and charges which shall be included in the final order or
369 judgment, excluding attorney attorney's fees. This section shall
370 not apply to protests filed by the Office of Supplier Diversity.
371 Upon payment of such costs and charges by the protestor, the
372 bond, cashier's check, official bank check, or money order shall
373 be returned to the protestor. If, after the completion of the
374 administrative hearing process and any appellate court
375 proceedings, the protestor prevails, the protestor shall recover
Page 15 of 54
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5207-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5207 2026
376 from the department, water management district, or agency all
377 costs and charges which shall be included in the final order or
378 judgment, excluding attorney attorney's fees.
379 (3) To establish a system of coordinated, uniform
380 procurement policies, procedures, and practices to be used by
381 agencies in acquiring commodities and contractual services,
382 which shall include, but not be limited to:
383 (b)1. Development of procedures for advertising
384 solicitations. These procedures must provide for electronic
385 posting of solicitations for at least 10 days before the date
386 set for receipt of bids, proposals, or replies, unless the
387 department or other agency determines in writing that a shorter
388 period of time is necessary to avoid harming the interests of
389 the state. The Office of Supplier Diversity may consult with the
390 department regarding the development of solicitation
391 distribution procedures to ensure that maximum distribution is
392 afforded to certified minority business enterprises as defined
393 in s. 288.703.
394 2. Development of procedures for electronic posting. The
395 department shall designate a centralized website on the Internet
396 for the department and other agencies to electronically post
397 solicitations, decisions or intended decisions, and other
398 matters relating to procurement.
399 (c) Development of procedures for the receipt and opening
400 of bids, proposals, or replies by an agency. Such procedures
Page 16 of 54
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5207-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5207 2026
401 shall provide the Office of Supplier Diversity an opportunity to
402 monitor and ensure that the contract award is consistent with
403 the requirements of s. 287.09451.
404 Section 10. Section 287.0943, Florida Statutes, is
405 repealed.
406 Section 11. Section 287.09431, Florida Statutes, is
407 repealed.
408 Section 12. Section 287.09451, Florida Statutes, is
409 amended to read:
410 287.09451 Office of Supplier Development Diversity;
411 powers, duties, and functions.—
412 (1) The Legislature finds that there is evidence of a
413 systematic pattern of past and continuing racial discrimination
414 against minority business enterprises and a disparity in the
415 availability and use of minority business enterprises in the
416 state procurement system. It is determined to be a compelling
417 state interest to rectify such discrimination and disparity.
418 Based upon statistical data profiling this discrimination, the
419 Legislature has enacted race-conscious and gender-conscious
420 remedial programs to ensure minority participation in the
421 economic life of the state, in state contracts for the purchase
422 of commodities and services, and in construction contracts. The
423 purpose and intent of this section is to increase participation
424 by minority business enterprises accomplished by encouraging the
425 use of minority business enterprises and the entry of new and
Page 17 of 54
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5207-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5207 2026
426 diversified minority business enterprises into the marketplace.
427 (1)(2) The Office of Supplier Development Diversity is
428 established within the Department of Management Services to
429 assist Florida-based small minority business enterprises in
430 becoming suppliers of commodities, services, and construction to
431 state government.
432 (2)(3) The secretary shall appoint an executive director
433 for the Office of Supplier Development Diversity, who shall
434 serve at the pleasure of the secretary.
435 (3)(4) The Office of Supplier Development Diversity shall
436 have the following powers, duties, and functions:
437 (a) To receive and disseminate information:
438 1. For the continued growth and success of Florida's small
439 businesses, which may include the planning, hosting, and support
440 of events for Florida-based small business enterprises.
441 2. Related to procurement opportunities for Florida-based
442 small business enterprises.
443 (b) To create electronic certification and recertification
444 processes for veteran-owned small business enterprises. The
445 certifications must be valid for 2 years and must be recertified
446 every 2 years thereafter. The benefits of certification must be
447 clearly posted on the department's website. To be eligible for
448 certification and recertification as a veteran-owned business
449 enterprise, a business must meet the requirements of s. 295.187.
450 (c) To advise and provide education or other resources to
Page 18 of 54
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5207-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5207 2026
451 agencies on methods and techniques for achieving procurement
452 objectives that increase the use of Florida-based small business
453 enterprises in state and local government procurement contracts.
454 (d) To adopt rules, establish processes, and prescribe and
455 publish forms as necessary to carry out the duties provided in
456 this section.
457 (a) To adopt rules to determine what constitutes a "good
458 faith effort" for purposes of state agency compliance with the
459 minority business enterprise procurement goals set forth in s.
460 287.042. Factors which shall be considered by the Minority
461 Business Enterprise Assistance Office in determining good faith
462 effort shall include, but not be limited to:
463 1. Whether the agency scheduled presolicitation or prebid
464 meetings for the purpose of informing minority business
465 enterprises of contracting and subcontracting opportunities.
466 2. Whether the contractor advertised in general
467 circulation, trade association, or minority-focus media
468 concerning the subcontracting opportunities.
469 3. Whether the agency effectively used services and
470 resources of available minority community organizations;
471 minority contractors' groups; local, state, and federal minority
472 business assistance offices; and other organizations that
473 provide assistance in the recruitment and placement of minority
474 business enterprises or minority persons.
475 4. Whether the agency provided written notice to a
Page 19 of 54
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5207-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5207 2026
476 reasonable number of minority business enterprises that their
477 interest in contracting with the agency was being solicited in
478 sufficient time to allow the minority business enterprises to
479 participate effectively.
480 (b) To adopt rules to determine what constitutes a "good
481 faith effort" for purposes of contractor compliance with
482 contractual requirements relating to the use of services or
483 commodities of a minority business enterprise under s.
484 287.094(2). Factors which shall be considered by the Office of
485 Supplier Diversity in determining whether a contractor has made
486 good faith efforts shall include, but not be limited to:
487 1. Whether the contractor attended any presolicitation or
488 prebid meetings that were scheduled by the agency to inform
489 minority business enterprises of contracting and subcontracting
490 opportunities.
491 2. Whether the contractor advertised in general
492 circulation, trade association, or minority-focus media
493 concerning the subcontracting opportunities.
494 3. Whether the contractor provided written notice to a
495 reasonable number of specific minority business enterprises that
496 their interest in the contract was being solicited in sufficient
497 time to allow the minority business enterprises to participate
498 effectively.
499 4. Whether the contractor followed up initial
500 solicitations of interest by contacting minority business
Page 20 of 54
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5207-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5207 2026
501 enterprises or minority persons to determine with certainty
502 whether the minority business enterprises or minority persons
503 were interested.
504 5. Whether the contractor selected portions of the work to
505 be performed by minority business enterprises in order to
506 increase the likelihood of meeting the minority business
507 enterprise procurement goals, including, where appropriate,
508 breaking down contracts into economically feasible units to
509 facilitate minority business enterprise participation.
510 6. Whether the contractor provided interested minority
511 business enterprises or minority persons with adequate
512 information about the plans, specifications, and requirements of
513 the contract or the availability of jobs.
514 7. Whether the contractor negotiated in good faith with
515 interested minority business enterprises or minority persons,
516 not rejecting minority business enterprises or minority persons
517 as unqualified without sound reasons based on a thorough
518 investigation of their capabilities.
519 8. Whether the contractor effectively used the services of
520 available minority community organizations; minority
521 contractors' groups; local, state, and federal minority business
522 assistance offices; and other organizations that provide
523 assistance in the recruitment and placement of minority business
524 enterprises or minority persons.
525 (c) To adopt rules and do all things necessary or
Page 21 of 54
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5207-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5207 2026
526 convenient to guide all state agencies toward making
527 expenditures for commodities, contractual services,
528 construction, and architectural and engineering services with
529 certified minority business enterprises in accordance with the
530 minority business enterprise procurement goals set forth in s.
531 287.042.
532 (d) To monitor the degree to which agencies procure
533 services, commodities, and construction from minority business
534 enterprises in conjunction with the Department of Financial
535 Services as specified in s. 17.11.
536 (e) To receive and disseminate information relative to
537 procurement opportunities, availability of minority business
538 enterprises, and technical assistance.
539 (f) To advise agencies on methods and techniques for
540 achieving procurement objectives.
541 (g) To provide a central minority business enterprise
542 certification process which includes independent verification of
543 status as a minority business enterprise.
544 (h) To develop procedures to investigate complaints
545 against minority business enterprises or contractors alleged to
546 violate any provision related to this section or s. 287.0943,
547 that may include visits to worksites or business premises, and
548 to refer all information on businesses suspected of
549 misrepresenting minority status to the Department of Management
550 Services for investigation. When an investigation is completed
Page 22 of 54
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5207-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5207 2026
551 and there is reason to believe that a violation has occurred,
552 the matter shall be referred to the office of the Attorney
553 General, Department of Legal Affairs, for prosecution.
554 (i) To maintain a directory of all minority business
555 enterprises which have been certified and provide this
556 information to any agency or business requesting it.
557 (j) To encourage all firms which do more than $1 million
558 in business with the state within a 12-month period to develop,
559 implement, and submit to this office a minority business
560 development plan.
561 (k) To communicate on a monthly basis with the Small and
562 Minority Business Advisory Council to keep the council informed
563 on issues relating to minority enterprise procurement.
564 (l) To serve as an advocate for minority business
565 enterprises, and coordinate with the small and minority business
566 ombudsman, as defined in s. 288.703, which duties shall include:
567 1. Ensuring that agencies supported by state funding
568 effectively target the delivery of services and resources, as
569 related to minority business enterprises.
570 2. Establishing standards within each industry with which
571 the state government contracts on how agencies and contractors
572 may provide the maximum practicable opportunity for minority
573 business enterprises.
574 3. Assisting agencies and contractors by providing
575 outreach to minority businesses, by specifying and monitoring
Page 23 of 54
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5207-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5207 2026
576 technical and managerial competence for minority business
577 enterprises, and by consulting in planning of agency procurement
578 to determine how best to provide opportunities for minority
579 business enterprises.
580 4. Integrating technical and managerial assistance for
581 minority business enterprises with government contracting
582 opportunities.
583 (m) To certify minority business enterprises, as defined
584 in s. 288.703, and as specified in ss. 287.0943 and 287.09431,
585 and shall recertify such minority businesses at least once every
586 2 years. Minority business enterprises must be recertified at
587 least once every 2 years. Such certifications may include an
588 electronic signature.
589 (n)1. To develop procedures to be used by an agency in
590 identifying commodities, contractual services, architectural and
591 engineering services, and construction contracts, except those
592 architectural, engineering, construction, or other related
593 services or contracts subject to the provisions of chapter 339,
594 that could be provided by minority business enterprises. Each
595 agency is encouraged to spend 21 percent of the moneys actually
596 expended for construction contracts, 25 percent of the moneys
597 actually expended for architectural and engineering contracts,
598 24 percent of the moneys actually expended for commodities, and
599 50.5 percent of the moneys actually expended for contractual
600 services during the previous fiscal year, except for the state
Page 24 of 54
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5207-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5207 2026
601 university construction program which shall be based upon public
602 education capital outlay projections for the subsequent fiscal
603 year, and reported to the Legislature pursuant to s. 216.023,
604 for the purpose of entering into contracts with certified
605 minority business enterprises as defined in s. 288.703, or
606 approved joint ventures. However, in the event of budget
607 reductions pursuant to s. 216.221, the base amounts may be
608 adjusted to reflect such reductions. The overall spending goal
609 for each industry category shall be subdivided as follows:
610 a. For construction contracts: 4 percent for black
611 Americans, 6 percent for Hispanic-Americans, and 11 percent for
612 American women.
613 b. For architectural and engineering contracts: 9 percent
614 for Hispanic-Americans, 1 percent for Asian-Americans, and 15
615 percent for American women.
616 c. For commodities: 2 percent for black Americans, 4
617 percent for Hispanic-Americans, 0.5 percent for Asian-Americans,
618 0.5 percent for Native Americans, and 17 percent for American
619 women.
620 d. For contractual services: 6 percent for black
621 Americans, 7 percent for Hispanic-Americans, 1 percent for
622 Asian-Americans, 0.5 percent for Native Americans, and 36
623 percent for American women.
624 2. For the purposes of commodities contracts for the
625 purchase of equipment to be used in the construction and
Page 25 of 54
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5207-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5207 2026
626 maintenance of state transportation facilities involving the
627 Department of Transportation, the terms "minority business
628 enterprise" and "minority person" have the same meanings as
629 provided in s. 288.703. In order to ensure that the goals
630 established under this paragraph for contracting with certified
631 minority business enterprises are met, the department, with the
632 assistance of the Office of Supplier Diversity, shall make
633 recommendations to the Legislature on revisions to the goals,
634 based on an updated statistical analysis, at least once every 5
635 years. Such recommendations shall be based on statistical data
636 indicating the availability of and disparity in the use of
637 minority businesses contracting with the state.
638 3. In determining the base amounts for assessing
639 compliance with this paragraph, the Office of Supplier Diversity
640 may develop, by rule, guidelines for all agencies to use in
641 establishing such base amounts. These rules must include, but
642 are not limited to, guidelines for calculation of base amounts,
643 a deadline for the agencies to submit base amounts, a deadline
644 for approval of the base amounts by the Office of Supplier
645 Diversity, and procedures for adjusting the base amounts as a
646 result of budget reductions made pursuant to s. 216.221.
647 4. To determine guidelines for the use of price
648 preferences, weighted preference formulas, or other preferences,
649 as appropriate to the particular industry or trade, to increase
650 the participation of minority businesses in state contracting.
Page 26 of 54
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5207-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5207 2026
651 These guidelines shall include consideration of:
652 a. Size and complexity of the project.
653 b. The concentration of transactions with minority
654 business enterprises for the commodity or contractual services
655 in question in prior agency contracting.
656 c. The specificity and definition of work allocated to
657 participating minority business enterprises.
658 d. The capacity of participating minority business
659 enterprises to complete the tasks identified in the project.
660 e. The available pool of minority business enterprises as
661 prime contractors, either alone or as partners in an approved
662 joint venture that serves as the prime contractor.
663 5. To determine guidelines for use of joint ventures to
664 meet minority business enterprises spending goals. For purposes
665 of this section, "joint venture" means any association of two or
666 more business concerns to carry out a single business enterprise
667 for profit, for which purpose they combine their property,
668 capital, efforts, skills, and knowledge. The guidelines shall
669 allow transactions with joint ventures to be eligible for credit
670 against the minority business enterprise goals of an agency when
671 the contracting joint venture demonstrates that at least one
672 partner to the joint venture is a certified minority business
673 enterprise as defined in s. 288.703, and that such partner is
674 responsible for a clearly defined portion of the work to be
675 performed, and shares in the ownership, control, management,
Page 27 of 54
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5207-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5207 2026
676 responsibilities, risks, and profits of the joint venture. Such
677 demonstration shall be by verifiable documents and sworn
678 statements and may be reviewed by the Office of Supplier
679 Diversity at or before the time a contract bid, proposal, or
680 reply is submitted. An agency may count toward its minority
681 business enterprise goals a portion of the total dollar amount
682 of a contract equal to the percentage of the ownership and
683 control held by the qualifying certified minority business
684 partners in the contracting joint venture, so long as the joint
685 venture meets the guidelines adopted by the office.
686 (o)1. To establish a system to record and measure the use
687 of certified minority business enterprises in state contracting.
688 This system shall maintain information and statistics on
689 certified minority business enterprise participation, awards,
690 dollar volume of expenditures and agency goals, and other
691 appropriate types of information to analyze progress in the
692 access of certified minority business enterprises to state
693 contracts and to monitor agency compliance with this section.
694 Such reporting must include, but is not limited to, the
695 identification of all subcontracts in state contracting by
696 dollar amount and by number of subcontracts and the
697 identification of the utilization of certified minority business
698 enterprises as prime contractors and subcontractors by dollar
699 amounts of contracts and subcontracts, number of contracts and
700 subcontracts, minority status, industry, and any conditions or
Page 28 of 54
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5207-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5207 2026
701 circumstances that significantly affected the performance of
702 subcontractors. Agencies shall report their compliance with the
703 requirements of this reporting system at least annually and at
704 the request of the office. All agencies shall cooperate with the
705 office in establishing this reporting system. Except in
706 construction contracting, all agencies shall review contracts
707 costing in excess of CATEGORY FOUR as defined in s. 287.017 to
708 determine if such contracts could be divided into smaller
709 contracts to be separately solicited and awarded, and shall,
710 when economical, offer such smaller contracts to encourage
711 minority participation.
712 2. To report agency compliance with the provisions of
713 subparagraph 1. for the preceding fiscal year to the Governor
714 and Cabinet, the President of the Senate, and the Speaker of the
715 House of Representatives on or before February 1 of each year.
716 The report must contain, at a minimum, the following:
717 a. Total expenditures of each agency by industry.
718 b. The dollar amount and percentage of contracts awarded
719 to certified minority business enterprises by each state agency.
720 c. The dollar amount and percentage of contracts awarded
721 indirectly to certified minority business enterprises as
722 subcontractors by each state agency.
723 d. The total dollar amount and percentage of contracts
724 awarded to certified minority business enterprises, whether
725 directly or indirectly, as subcontractors.
Page 29 of 54
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5207-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5207 2026
726 e. A statement and assessment of good faith efforts taken
727 by each state agency.
728 f. A status report of agency compliance with subsection
729 (6), as determined by the Minority Business Enterprise Office.
730 (5)(a) Each agency shall, at the time the specifications
731 or designs are developed or contract sizing is determined for
732 any proposed procurement costing in excess of CATEGORY FOUR, as
733 defined in s. 287.017, forward a notice to the Office of
734 Supplier Diversity of the proposed procurement and any
735 determination on the designs of specifications of the proposed
736 procurement that impose requirements on prospective vendors, no
737 later than 30 days prior to the issuance of a solicitation,
738 except that this provision shall not apply to emergency
739 acquisitions. The 30-day notice period shall not toll the time
740 for any other procedural requirements.
741 (b) If the Office of Supplier Diversity determines that
742 the proposed procurement will not likely allow opportunities for
743 minority business enterprises, the office may, within 20 days
744 after it receives the information specified in paragraph (a),
745 propose the implementation of minority business enterprise
746 utilization provisions or submit alternative procurement methods
747 that would significantly increase minority business enterprise
748 contracting opportunities.
749 (c) Whenever the agency and the Office of Supplier
750 Diversity disagree, the matter shall be submitted for
Page 30 of 54
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5207-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5207 2026
751 determination to the head of the agency or the senior-level
752 official designated pursuant to this section as liaison for
753 minority business enterprise issues.
754 (d) If the proposed procurement proceeds to competitive
755 solicitation, the office is hereby granted standing to protest,
756 pursuant to this section, in a timely manner, any contract award
757 during competitive solicitation for contractual services and
758 construction contracts that fail to include minority business
759 enterprise participation, if any responsible and responsive
760 vendor has demonstrated the ability to achieve any level of
761 participation, or, any contract award for commodities where, a
762 reasonable and economical opportunity to reserve a contract,
763 statewide or district level, for minority participation was not
764 executed or, an agency failed to adopt an applicable preference
765 for minority participation. The bond requirement shall be waived
766 for the office purposes of this subsection.
767 (e) An agency may presume that a vendor offering no
768 minority participation has not made a good faith effort when
769 other vendors offer minority participation of firms listed as
770 relevant to the agency's purchasing needs in the pertinent
771 locality or statewide to complete the project.
772 (f) Paragraph (a) will not apply when the Office of
773 Supplier Diversity determines that an agency has established a
774 work plan to allow advance consultation and planning with
775 minority business enterprises and where such plan clearly
Page 31 of 54
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5207-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5207 2026
776 demonstrates:
777 1. A high level of advance planning by the agency with
778 minority business enterprises.
779 2. A high level of accessibility, knowledge, and
780 experience by minority business enterprises in the agency's
781 contract decisionmaking process.
782 3. A high quality of agency monitoring and enforcement of
783 internal implementation of minority business utilization
784 provisions.
785 4. A high quality of agency monitoring and enforcement of
786 contractor utilization of minority business enterprises,
787 especially tracking subcontractor data, and ensuring the
788 integrity of subcontractor reporting.
789 5. A high quality of agency outreach, agency networking of
790 major vendors with minority vendors, and innovation in
791 techniques to improve utilization of minority business
792 enterprises.
793 6. Substantial commitment, sensitivity, and proactive
794 attitude by the agency head and among the agency minority
795 business staff.
796 (6) Each state agency shall coordinate its minority
797 business enterprise procurement activities with the Office of
798 Supplier Diversity. At a minimum, each agency shall:
799 (a) Adopt a minority business enterprise utilization plan
800 for review and approval by the Office of Supplier Diversity
Page 32 of 54
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5207-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5207 2026
801 which should require meaningful and useful methods to attain the
802 legislative intent in assisting minority business enterprises.
803 (b) Designate a senior-level employee in the agency as a
804 minority enterprise assistance officer, responsible for
805 overseeing the agency's minority business utilization
806 activities, and who is not also charged with purchasing
807 responsibility. A senior-level agency employee and agency
808 purchasing officials shall be accountable to the agency head for
809 the agency's minority business utilization performance. The
810 Office of Supplier Diversity shall advise each agency on
811 compliance performance.
812 (c) If an agency deviates significantly from its
813 utilization plan in 2 consecutive or 3 out of 5 total fiscal
814 years, the Office of Supplier Diversity may review any and all
815 solicitations and contract awards of the agency as deemed
816 necessary until such time as the agency meets its utilization
817 plan.
818 Section 13. Section 287.0947, Florida Statutes, is
819 repealed.
820 Section 14. Subsections (2), (10), and (11) of section
821 288.706, Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
822 288.706 Florida Minority Business Loan Mobilization
823 Program.—
824 (2) The Florida Minority Business Loan Mobilization
825 Program is created to promote the development of minority
Page 33 of 54
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5207-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5207 2026
826 business enterprises, as defined in s. 288.703(2) s. 288.703(3),
827 increase the ability of minority business enterprises to compete
828 for state contracts, and sustain the economic growth of minority
829 business enterprises in this state. The goal of the program is
830 to assist minority business enterprises by facilitating working
831 capital loans to minority business enterprises that are vendors
832 on state agency contracts. The Department of Management Services
833 shall administer the program.
834 (10) The Department of Management Services shall maintain
835 a listing of financial institutions willing to participate in
836 the Florida Minority Business Loan Mobilization Program. This
837 list of financial institutions shall not be exclusive. A
838 minority business enterprise vendor who has a working
839 relationship with a financial institution is encouraged to
840 request that the financial institution apply to participate as a
841 financial institution for the program.
842 (11) The Department of Management Services shall
843 collaborate with the department to assist in the development and
844 enhancement of black business enterprises.
845 Section 15. Subsection (18) of section 318.18, Florida
846 Statutes, is amended to read:
847 318.18 Amount of penalties.—The penalties required for a
848 noncriminal disposition pursuant to s. 318.14 or a criminal
849 offense listed in s. 318.17 are as follows:
850 (18) In addition to any penalties imposed, a surcharge of
Page 34 of 54
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5207-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5207 2026
851 $3 must be paid for all criminal offenses listed in s. 318.17
852 and for all noncriminal moving traffic violations under chapter
853 316. Revenue from the surcharge shall be remitted to the
854 Department of Revenue and deposited quarterly into the State
855 Agency Law Enforcement Radio System Trust Fund of the Department
856 of Management Services for the state agency law enforcement
857 radio system, as described in s. 282.709, and to provide
858 technical assistance to state agencies and local law enforcement
859 agencies with their statewide systems of regional law
860 enforcement communications, as described in s. 282.7101. This
861 subsection expires July 1, 2026. The Department of Management
862 Services may retain funds sufficient to recover the costs and
863 expenses incurred for managing, administering, and overseeing
864 the Statewide Law Enforcement Radio System, and providing
865 technical assistance to state agencies and local law enforcement
866 agencies with their statewide systems of regional law
867 enforcement communications. The Department of Management
868 Services working in conjunction with the Joint Task Force on
869 State Agency Law Enforcement Communications shall determine and
870 direct the purposes for which these funds are used to enhance
871 and improve the radio system.
872 Section 16. Subsection (17) of section 318.21, Florida
873 Statutes, is amended to read:
874 318.21 Disposition of civil penalties by county courts.—
875 All civil penalties received by a county court pursuant to the
Page 35 of 54
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5207-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5207 2026
876 provisions of this chapter shall be distributed and paid monthly
877 as follows:
878 (17) Notwithstanding subsections (1) and (2), the proceeds
879 from the administrative fee imposed under s. 318.18(18) shall be
880 distributed as provided in that subsection. This subsection
881 expires July 1, 2026.
882 Section 17. Subsection (2) of section 17.11, Florida
883 Statutes, is amended to read:
884 17.11 To report disbursements made.—
885 (2) The Chief Financial Officer shall also cause to have
886 reported from the Florida Accounting Information Resource
887 Subsystem no less than quarterly the disbursements which
888 agencies made to small businesses, as defined in the Florida
889 Small and Minority Business Assistance Act; to certified
890 minority business enterprises in the aggregate; and to certified
891 minority business enterprises broken down into categories of
892 minority persons, as well as gender and nationality subgroups.
893 This information shall be made available to the agencies, the
894 Office of Supplier Development Diversity, the Governor, the
895 President of the Senate, and the Speaker of the House of
896 Representatives. Each agency shall be responsible for the
897 accuracy of information entered into the Florida Accounting
898 Information Resource Subsystem for use in this reporting.
899 Section 18. Subsection (1) of section 24.113, Florida
900 Statutes, is amended to read:
Page 36 of 54
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5207-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5207 2026
901 24.113 Minority participation.—
902 (1) It is the intent of the Legislature that the
903 department encourage participation by minority business
904 enterprises as defined in s. 288.703. Accordingly, 15 percent of
905 the retailers shall be minority business enterprises as defined
906 in s. 288.703(2) s. 288.703(3); however, no more than 35 percent
907 of such retailers shall be owned by the same type of minority
908 person, as defined in s. 288.703(3) s. 288.703(4). The
909 department is encouraged to meet the minority business
910 enterprise procurement goals set forth in s. 287.09451 in the
911 procurement of commodities, contractual services, construction,
912 and architectural and engineering services. This section shall
913 not preclude or prohibit a minority person from competing for
914 any other retailing or vending agreement awarded by the
915 department.
916 Section 19. Paragraph (g) of subsection (3) of section
917 212.096, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
918 212.096 Sales, rental, storage, use tax; enterprise zone
919 jobs credit against sales tax.—
920 (3) In order to claim this credit, an eligible business
921 must file under oath with the governing body or enterprise zone
922 development agency having jurisdiction over the enterprise zone
923 where the business is located, as applicable, a statement which
924 includes:
925 (g) Whether the business is a small business as defined by
Page 37 of 54
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5207-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5207 2026
926 s. 288.703(5) s. 288.703(6).
927 Section 20. Subsection (1) of section 255.101, Florida
928 Statutes, is amended to read:
929 255.101 Contracts for public construction works;
930 utilization of minority business enterprises.—
931 (1) All county officials, boards of county commissioners,
932 school boards, city councils, city commissioners, and all other
933 public officers of state boards or commissions which are charged
934 with the letting of contracts for public works and for the
935 construction of public bridges, buildings, and other structures
936 shall operate in accordance with s. 287.093, except that all
937 contracts for the construction of state facilities should comply
938 with provisions in s. 287.09451, and rules adopted pursuant
939 thereto, for the utilization of minority business enterprises.
940 When construction is financed in whole or in part from federal
941 funds and where federal provisions for utilization of minority
942 business enterprises apply, this section shall not apply.
943 Section 21. Subsections (1), (2), and (4) of section
944 255.102, Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
945 255.102 Contractor utilization of minority business
946 enterprises.—
947 (1) Agencies shall consider the use of price preferences,
948 weighted preference formulas, or other preferences for
949 construction contracts, as determined appropriate by the Office
950 of Supplier Development Diversity to increase minority
Page 38 of 54
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5207-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5207 2026
951 participation.
952 (2) The Office of Supplier Development Diversity, in
953 collaboration with the Board of Governors of the State
954 University System, shall adopt rules to determine what is a
955 "good faith effort" for purposes of contractor compliance with
956 minority participation goals established for competitively
957 awarded building and construction projects. Pro forma efforts
958 shall not be considered good faith. Factors which shall be
959 considered by the state agency in determining whether a
960 contractor has made good faith efforts shall include, but not be
961 limited to:
962 (a) Whether the contractor attended any presolicitation or
963 prebid meetings that were scheduled by the agency to inform
964 minority business enterprises of contracting and subcontracting
965 opportunities.
966 (b) Whether the contractor advertised in general
967 circulation, trade association, or minority-focus media
968 concerning the subcontracting opportunities.
969 (c) Whether the contractor provided written notice to all
970 relevant subcontractors listed on the minority vendor list for
971 that locality and statewide as provided by the agency as of the
972 date of issuance of the invitation to bid, that their interest
973 in the contract was being solicited in sufficient time to allow
974 the minority business enterprises to participate effectively.
975 (d) Whether the contractor followed up initial
Page 39 of 54
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5207-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5207 2026
976 solicitations of interest by contacting minority business
977 enterprises, the Office of Supplier Development Diversity, or
978 minority persons who responded and provided detailed information
979 about prebid meetings, access to plans, specifications,
980 contractor's project manager, subcontractor bonding, if any,
981 payment schedule, bid addenda, and other assistance provided by
982 the contractor to enhance minority business enterprise
983 participation.
984 (e) Whether the contractor selected portions of the work
985 to be performed by minority business enterprises in order to
986 increase the likelihood of meeting the minority business
987 enterprise procurement goals, including, where appropriate,
988 breaking down contracts into economically feasible units to
989 facilitate minority business enterprise participation under
990 reasonable and economical conditions of performance.
991 (f) Whether the contractor provided the Office of Supplier
992 Development Diversity as well as interested minority business
993 enterprises or minority persons with adequate information about
994 the plans, specifications, and requirements of the contract or
995 the availability of jobs at a time no later than when such
996 information was provided to other subcontractors.
997 (g) Whether the contractor negotiated in good faith with
998 interested minority business enterprises or minority persons,
999 not rejecting minority business enterprises or minority persons
1000 as unqualified without sound reasons based on a thorough
Page 40 of 54
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5207-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5207 2026
1001 investigation of their capabilities or imposing implausible
1002 conditions of performance on the contract.
1003 (h) Whether the contractor diligently seeks to replace a
1004 minority business enterprise subcontractor that is unable to
1005 perform successfully with another minority business enterprise.
1006 (i) Whether the contractor effectively used the services
1007 of available minority community organizations; minority
1008 contractors' groups; local, state, and federal minority business
1009 assistance offices; and other organizations that provide
1010 assistance in the recruitment and placement of minority business
1011 enterprises or minority persons.
1012 (4) Notwithstanding the provisions of s. 287.09451 to the
1013 contrary, Agencies shall monitor good faith efforts of
1014 contractors in competitively awarded building and construction
1015 projects, in accordance with rules established pursuant to this
1016 section. It is the responsibility of the contractor to exercise
1017 good faith efforts in accordance with rules established pursuant
1018 to this section, and to provide documentation necessary to
1019 assess efforts to include minority business participation.
1020 Section 22. Paragraph (d) of subsection (3) of section
1021 287.055, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
1022 287.055 Acquisition of professional architectural,
1023 engineering, landscape architectural, or surveying and mapping
1024 services; definitions; procedures; contingent fees prohibited;
1025 penalties.—
Page 41 of 54
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5207-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5207 2026
1026 (3) PUBLIC ANNOUNCEMENT AND QUALIFICATION PROCEDURES.—
1027 (d) Each agency shall evaluate professional services,
1028 including capabilities, adequacy of personnel, past record,
1029 experience, whether the firm is a certified minority business
1030 enterprise as defined by the Florida Small and Minority Business
1031 Assistance Act, and other factors determined by the agency to be
1032 applicable to its particular requirements. When securing
1033 professional services, an agency must endeavor to meet the
1034 minority business enterprise procurement goals under s.
1035 287.09451.
1036 Section 23. Subsections (7) and (8) of section 287.057,
1037 Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
1038 287.057 Procurement of commodities or contractual
1039 services.—
1040 (7) Upon issuance of any solicitation, an agency shall,
1041 upon request by the department, forward to the department one
1042 copy of each solicitation for all commodity and contractual
1043 services purchases in excess of the threshold amount provided in
1044 s. 287.017 for CATEGORY TWO. An agency shall also, upon request,
1045 furnish a copy of all competitive-solicitation tabulations. The
1046 Office of Supplier Development Diversity may also request from
1047 the agencies any information submitted to the department
1048 pursuant to this subsection.
1049 (8)(a) In order to strive to meet the minority business
1050 enterprise procurement goals set forth in s. 287.09451, An
Page 42 of 54
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5207-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5207 2026
1051 agency may reserve any contract for competitive solicitation
1052 only among certified minority business enterprises. Agencies
1053 shall review all their contracts each fiscal year and shall
1054 determine which contracts may be reserved for solicitation only
1055 among certified minority business enterprises. This reservation
1056 may only be used when it is determined, by reasonable and
1057 objective means, before the solicitation that there are capable,
1058 qualified certified minority business enterprises available to
1059 submit a bid, proposal, or reply on a contract to provide for
1060 effective competition. The Office of Supplier Development
1061 Diversity shall consult with any agency in reaching such
1062 determination when deemed appropriate.
1063 (b) Before a contract may be reserved for solicitation
1064 only among certified minority business enterprises, the agency
1065 head must find that such a reservation is in the best interests
1066 of the state. All determinations shall be subject to s.
1067 287.09451(5). Once a decision has been made to reserve a
1068 contract, but before sealed bids, proposals, or replies are
1069 requested, the agency shall estimate what it expects the amount
1070 of the contract to be, based on the nature of the services or
1071 commodities involved and their value under prevailing market
1072 conditions. If all the sealed bids, proposals, or replies
1073 received are over this estimate, the agency may reject the bids,
1074 proposals, or replies and request new ones from certified
1075 minority business enterprises, or the agency may reject the
Page 43 of 54
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5207-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5207 2026
1076 bids, proposals, or replies and reopen the bidding to all
1077 eligible vendors.
1078 (c) All agencies shall consider the use of price
1079 preferences of up to 10 percent, weighted preference formulas,
1080 or other preferences for vendors as determined appropriate
1081 pursuant to guidelines established in accordance with s.
1082 287.09451(4) to increase the participation of minority business
1083 enterprises.
1084 (d) All agencies shall avoid any undue concentration of
1085 contracts or purchases in categories of commodities or
1086 contractual services in order to meet the Florida-based small
1087 minority business enterprise purchasing goals in s. 287.09451.
1088 Section 24. Subsection (4) of section 287.094, Florida
1089 Statutes, is amended to read:
1090 287.094 Minority business enterprise programs; penalty for
1091 discrimination and false representation.—
1092 (4) No agency shall deny any contractor, firm, or
1093 individual a fair opportunity to compete in the public
1094 procurement of commodities and services based on race, national
1095 origin, gender, religion, or physical disability, which for
1096 purposes of this subsection constitutes prohibited
1097 discrimination. Complaints alleging prohibited discrimination by
1098 an agency in its public procurement may be filed with the Office
1099 of Supplier Development Diversity within 60 days after the facts
1100 giving rise to the complaint are known or reasonably should have
Page 44 of 54
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5207-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5207 2026
1101 been discovered. Any complaint shall be filed in writing and
1102 must set forth the specific facts giving rise to the claim of
1103 prohibited discrimination. The Office of Supplier Development
1104 Diversity shall, within 10 days, refer the complaint to the
1105 Inspector General for the agency that is the subject of the
1106 complaint, who shall coordinate a prompt investigation and issue
1107 written findings of fact. These findings shall be reviewed by
1108 the Chief Inspector General or his or her designee, who is
1109 authorized to conduct any further investigation deemed necessary
1110 or appropriate. Upon a final determination that an agency has
1111 abused its discretion by engaging in prohibited discrimination,
1112 the Chief Inspector General shall refer any state employee
1113 determined to have participated in the prohibited discrimination
1114 for disciplinary action in accordance with chapter 60K(9),
1115 Florida Administrative Code, and subsequently enacted rules, up
1116 to and including termination.
1117 Section 25. Subsection (1) of section 288.1167, Florida
1118 Statutes, is amended to read:
1119 288.1167 Sports franchise contract provisions for food and
1120 beverage concession and contract awards to minority business
1121 enterprises.—Any applicant who receives funding pursuant to the
1122 provisions of s. 212.20 must demonstrate that:
1123 (1) Funds and facilities with respect to food and beverage
1124 and related concessions shall be awarded to minority business
1125 enterprises as defined in s. 288.703 on the same terms and
Page 45 of 54
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5207-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5207 2026
1126 conditions as the general food and beverage concessionaire and
1127 in accordance with the minority business enterprise procurement
1128 goals set forth in s. 287.09451;
1129 Section 26. Subsections (2) through (6) of section
1130 288.703, Florida Statutes, are renumbered as subsections (1)
1131 through (5), respectively, and present subsections (1) and (5)
1132 of that section are amended to read:
1133 288.703 Definitions.—As used in ss. 288.702-288.706, the
1134 term:
1135 (1) "Certified minority business enterprise" means a
1136 business which has been certified by the certifying organization
1137 or jurisdiction in accordance with s. 287.0943(1) and (2).
1138 (4)(5) "Ombudsman" means an office or individual whose
1139 responsibilities include coordinating with the Office of
1140 Supplier Development Diversity for the interests of and
1141 providing assistance to small and minority business enterprises
1142 in dealing with governmental agencies and in developing
1143 proposals for changes in state agency rules.
1144 Section 27. Paragraph (a) of subsection (2) of section
1145 376.3072, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
1146 376.3072 Florida Petroleum Liability and Restoration
1147 Insurance Program.—
1148 (2)(a) An owner or operator of a petroleum storage system
1149 may become an insured in the restoration insurance program at a
1150 facility if:
Page 46 of 54
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5207-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5207 2026
1151 1. A site at which an incident has occurred is eligible
1152 for restoration if the insured is a participant in the third-
1153 party liability insurance program or otherwise meets applicable
1154 financial responsibility requirements. After July 1, 1993, the
1155 insured must also provide the required excess insurance coverage
1156 or self-insurance for restoration to achieve the financial
1157 responsibility requirements of 40 C.F.R. s. 280.97, subpart H,
1158 not covered by paragraph (d).
1159 2. A site which had a discharge reported before January 1,
1160 1989, for which notice was given pursuant to s. 376.3071(10) and
1161 which is ineligible for the third-party liability insurance
1162 program solely due to that discharge is eligible for
1163 participation in the restoration program for an incident
1164 occurring on or after January 1, 1989, pursuant to subsection
1165 (3). Restoration funding for an eligible contaminated site will
1166 be provided without participation in the third-party liability
1167 insurance program until the site is restored as required by the
1168 department or until the department determines that the site does
1169 not require restoration.
1170 3. Notwithstanding paragraph (b), a site where an
1171 application is filed with the department before January 1, 1995,
1172 where the owner is a small business under s. 288.703(5) s.
1173 288.703(6), a Florida College System institution with less than
1174 2,500 FTE, a religious institution as defined by s.
1175 212.08(7)(m), a charitable institution as defined by s.
Page 47 of 54
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5207-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5207 2026
1176 212.08(7)(p), or a county or municipality with a population of
1177 less than 50,000, is eligible for up to $400,000 of eligible
1178 restoration costs, less a deductible of $10,000 for small
1179 businesses, eligible Florida College System institutions, and
1180 religious or charitable institutions, and $30,000 for eligible
1181 counties and municipalities, if:
1182 a. Except as provided in sub-subparagraph e., the facility
1183 was in compliance with department rules at the time of the
1184 discharge.
1185 b. The owner or operator has, upon discovery of a
1186 discharge, promptly reported the discharge to the department,
1187 and drained and removed the system from service, if necessary.
1188 c. The owner or operator has not intentionally caused or
1189 concealed a discharge or disabled leak detection equipment.
1190 d. The owner or operator proceeds to complete initial
1191 remedial action as specified in department rules.
1192 e. The owner or operator, if required and if it has not
1193 already done so, applies for third-party liability coverage for
1194 the facility within 30 days after receipt of an eligibility
1195 order issued by the department pursuant to this subparagraph.
1196
1197 However, the department may consider in-kind services from
1198 eligible counties and municipalities in lieu of the $30,000
1199 deductible. The cost of conducting initial remedial action as
1200 defined by department rules is an eligible restoration cost
Page 48 of 54
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5207-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5207 2026
1201 pursuant to this subparagraph.
1202 4.a. By January 1, 1997, facilities at sites with existing
1203 contamination must have methods of release detection to be
1204 eligible for restoration insurance coverage for new discharges
1205 subject to department rules for secondary containment. Annual
1206 storage system testing, in conjunction with inventory control,
1207 shall be considered to be a method of release detection until
1208 the later of December 22, 1998, or 10 years after the date of
1209 installation or the last upgrade. Other methods of release
1210 detection for storage tanks which meet such requirement are:
1211 (I) Interstitial monitoring of tank and integral piping
1212 secondary containment systems;
1213 (II) Automatic tank gauging systems; or
1214 (III) A statistical inventory reconciliation system with a
1215 tank test every 3 years.
1216 b. For pressurized integral piping systems, the owner or
1217 operator must use:
1218 (I) An automatic in-line leak detector with flow
1219 restriction meeting the requirements of department rules used in
1220 conjunction with an annual tightness or pressure test; or
1221 (II) An automatic in-line leak detector with electronic
1222 flow shut-off meeting the requirements of department rules.
1223 c. For suction integral piping systems, the owner or
1224 operator must use:
1225 (I) A single check valve installed directly below the
Page 49 of 54
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5207-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5207 2026
1226 suction pump if there are no other valves between the dispenser
1227 and the tank; or
1228 (II) An annual tightness test or other approved test.
1229 d. Owners of facilities with existing contamination that
1230 install internal release detection systems pursuant to sub-
1231 subparagraph a. shall permanently close their external
1232 groundwater and vapor monitoring wells pursuant to department
1233 rules by December 31, 1998. Upon installation of the internal
1234 release detection system, such wells must be secured and taken
1235 out of service until permanent closure.
1236 e. Facilities with vapor levels of contamination meeting
1237 the requirements of or below the concentrations specified in the
1238 performance standards for release detection methods specified in
1239 department rules may continue to use vapor monitoring wells for
1240 release detection.
1241 f. The department may approve other methods of release
1242 detection for storage tanks and integral piping which have at
1243 least the same capability to detect a new release as the methods
1244 specified in this subparagraph.
1245
1246 Sites meeting the criteria of this subsection for which a site
1247 rehabilitation completion order was issued before June 1, 2008,
1248 do not qualify for the 2008 increase in site rehabilitation
1249 funding assistance and are bound by the pre-June 1, 2008,
1250 limits. Sites meeting the criteria of this subsection for which
Page 50 of 54
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5207-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5207 2026
1251 a site rehabilitation completion order was not issued before
1252 June 1, 2008, regardless of whether they have previously
1253 transitioned to nonstate-funded cleanup status, may continue
1254 state-funded cleanup pursuant to s. 376.3071(6) until a site
1255 rehabilitation completion order is issued or the increased site
1256 rehabilitation funding assistance limit is reached, whichever
1257 occurs first.
1258 Section 28. Paragraph (g) of subsection (1) of section
1259 376.84, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
1260 376.84 Brownfield redevelopment economic incentives.—It is
1261 the intent of the Legislature that brownfield redevelopment
1262 activities be viewed as opportunities to significantly improve
1263 the utilization, general condition, and appearance of these
1264 sites. Different standards than those in place for new
1265 development, as allowed under current state and local laws,
1266 should be used to the fullest extent to encourage the
1267 redevelopment of a brownfield. State and local governments are
1268 encouraged to offer redevelopment incentives for this purpose,
1269 as an ongoing public investment in infrastructure and services,
1270 to help eliminate the public health and environmental hazards,
1271 and to promote the creation of jobs in these areas. Such
1272 incentives may include financial, regulatory, and technical
1273 assistance to persons and businesses involved in the
1274 redevelopment of the brownfield pursuant to this act.
1275 (1) Financial incentives and local incentives for
Page 51 of 54
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5207-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5207 2026
1276 redevelopment may include, but not be limited to:
1277 (g) Minority business enterprise programs as provided in
1278 s. 287.0943.
1279 Section 29. Paragraph (a) of subsection (3) and subsection
1280 (6) of section 473.3065, Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
1281 473.3065 Clay Ford Scholarship Program; Certified Public
1282 Accountant Education Minority Assistance Advisory Council.—
1283 (3) The board shall adopt rules as necessary for
1284 administration of the Clay Ford Scholarship Program, including
1285 rules relating to the following:
1286 (a) Eligibility criteria for receipt of a scholarship,
1287 which, at a minimum, shall include the following factors:
1288 1. Financial need.
1289 2. Ethnic, gender, or racial minority status pursuant to
1290 s. 288.703(3) s. 288.703(4).
1291 3. Scholastic ability and performance.
1292 (6) There is hereby created the Certified Public
1293 Accountant Education Minority Assistance Advisory Council to
1294 assist the board in administering the Clay Ford Scholarship
1295 Program. The council shall be diverse and representative of the
1296 gender, ethnic, and racial categories set forth in s. 288.703(3)
1297 s. 288.703(4).
1298 (a) The council shall consist of five licensed Florida-
1299 certified public accountants selected by the board, of whom one
1300 shall be a board member who serves as chair of the council, one
Page 52 of 54
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5207-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5207 2026
1301 shall be a representative of the National Association of Black
1302 Accountants, one shall be a representative of the Cuban American
1303 CPA Association, and two shall be selected at large. At least
1304 one member of the council must be a woman.
1305 (b) The board shall determine the terms for initial
1306 appointments and appointments thereafter.
1307 (c) Any vacancy on the council shall be filled in the
1308 manner provided for the selection of the initial member. Any
1309 member appointed to fill a vacancy of an unexpired term shall be
1310 appointed for the remainder of that term.
1311 (d) Three consecutive absences or absences constituting 50
1312 percent or more of the council's meetings within any 12-month
1313 period shall cause the council membership of the member in
1314 question to become void, and the position shall be considered
1315 vacant.
1316 (e) The members of the council shall serve without
1317 compensation, and any necessary and actual expenses incurred by
1318 a member while engaged in the business of the council shall be
1319 borne by such member or by the organization or agency such
1320 member represents. However, the council member who is a member
1321 of the board shall be compensated in accordance with ss.
1322 455.207(4) and 112.061.
1323 Section 30. Paragraph (d) of subsection (7) of section
1324 1001.706, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
1325 1001.706 Powers and duties of the Board of Governors.—
Page 53 of 54
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5207-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5207 2026
1326 (7) POWERS AND DUTIES RELATING TO PROPERTY.—
1327 (d) The Board of Governors, or the board's designee, shall
1328 ensure compliance with the provisions of s. 287.09451 for all
1329 procurement and ss. 255.101 and 255.102 for construction
1330 contracts, and rules adopted pursuant thereto, relating to the
1331 utilization of minority business enterprises, except that
1332 procurements costing less than the amount provided for in
1333 CATEGORY FIVE as provided in s. 287.017 shall not be subject to
1334 s. 287.09451.
1335 Section 31. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 54 of 54
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5207-00